Hawaii, session 2026, HB387.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 707-705, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§707-705  Negligent injury in the first degree.  (1)  A person commits the offense of negligent injury in the first degree if that person causes: (a)  Serious bodily injury to another person by the operation of a vehicle in a negligent manner; [or] (b)  Substantial bodily injury to a vulnerable user by the operation of a [[]vehicle[]] in a negligent manner[.]; or (c)  Bodily injury to another person by operation of a vehicle in a negligent manner while under the influence of alcohol or drugs. (2) Negligent injury in the first degree is a class C felony." SECTION 2. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ By Request